Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.99.040

Office annual report.

(1) The office shall submit an annual report regarding the program to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with the reporting requirements in RCW 43.01.036.

(2) The annual report shall describe the design and implementation of the program, and must include the following:

(a) The number of applicants for medical student loans;

(b) The number of participants in the program;

(c) The number of participants in the program who complete their medical program;

(d) The number of participants in the program who are placed in employment;

(e) The nature of that employment, including the type of job; whether the job is full-time, part-time, or temporary; and the income range;

(f) Whether the participant is working in a rural underserved area, and what percent of the participant's patients are served by medicaid, the children's health insurance program, apple health, or other programs with similar eligibility requirements;

(g) Demographic profiles of both applicants and participants;

(h) The amount of the private funding collected for the program; and

(i) An estimate of when the program will be self-sustaining.

(3) The annual report must be submitted by December 1st of each year after July 1, 2020.

[ 2018 c 209 s 4.]